Virginia statutes. Title 25.1. Eminent Domain.
Article 5. Determination of Just Compensation by Jurors.

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 27 Property Actions. § 27.22 Condemnation and Eminent Domain. Friend.

§ 25.1-228.
Qualification of jurors.

The provisions of this article shall apply in eminent domain proceedings in which the issue of just compensation is to be determined by a jury.

Persons selected as condemnation jurors shall be residents of the county or city in which the property to be condemned, or the greater portion thereof, is situated. No person shall be eligible as a condemnation juror when he, or any person for him, solicits or requests a member of the jury commission to place his name on a list of condemnation jurors. All of the persons included on the list of condemnation jurors shall be freeholders of property within the jurisdiction.

History.

Code 1919, §§ 4366, 4367; 1928, p. 334; 1948, p. 168; Code 1950, §§ 25-12, 25-16; 1962, c. 426, § 25-46.20; 1968, c. 535; 1973, c. 510; 1974, c. 625; 1975, c. 551; 1991, c. 520; 1993, c. 906; 1997, c. 58; 2000, c. 1029; 2003, c. 940; 2006, c. 586.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 586 substituted “All” for “A majority” at the beginning of the last sentence in subsection B.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

7A M.J. Eminent Domain, § 74.

§ 25.1-229.
Selection of jurors.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the provisions of Chapter 11 (§

8.01-336

et seq.) of Title 8.01 shall apply to the selection of condemnation juries mutatis mutandis. While preserving the random selection process set forth in §

8.01-345

, the jury commissioner shall determine the freeholder status of individuals randomly selected by reference to tax rolls or other reliable data the judge of the circuit court deems appropriate.

All of the acting jurors and all of the names drawn for alternate jurors shall be freeholders of property within the jurisdiction. On the day set for trial, jurors who appear shall be called to be sworn on their voir dire until a disinterested and impartial panel is obtained. A juror may be stricken for cause. From the impartial panel the judge shall randomly select 13 jurors. From the panel of 13 jurors each party shall have four peremptory strikes. The court may appoint alternate jurors. Five persons from a panel of not fewer than 13 jurors shall constitute a jury in a condemnation case. If fewer than seven jurors remain before the court prior to the exercise of peremptory strikes, the trial may proceed and be heard by less than five jurors provided the parties agree. However, no trial shall proceed with fewer than three jurors.

The conclusion of the jurors need not be unanimous, and a majority of the jurors may act in the name of the jury.

In condemnation proceedings instituted by the Commissioner of Highways, a person owning structures or improvements for which an outdoor advertising permit has been issued by the Commissioner of Highways pursuant to §

33.2-1208

shall be deemed to be an “owner” for purposes of this section.

History.

Code 1919, §§ 4366, 4367; 1928, p. 334; 1948, p. 168; Code 1950, §§ 25-12, 25-16; 1962, c. 426, § 25-46.20; 1968, c. 535; 1973, c. 510; 1974, c. 625; 1975, c. 551; 1991, c. 520; 1993, c. 906; 1997, c. 58; 2000, c. 1029; 2003, c. 940; 2006, c. 586; 2007, cc. 450, 720.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, cc. 36 and 152, cl. 3 provides: “That the Virginia Code Commission shall carry out such editorial changes to the Code of Virginia as may be required to reflect the provisions of this act changing the title ‘Commonwealth Transportation Commissioner’ to ‘Commissioner of Highways.”’ “Commissioner of Highways” was substituted for “Commonwealth Transportation Commissioner” in this section.

References in this section were updated at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission to conform to the recodification of Title 33.2 by Acts 2014, c. 805, effective October 1, 2014.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 586 added the last sentence in subsection A; in subsection B, in the fifth sentence, substituted “all of the acting jurors and all of the names” for “a majority of the nine names drawn as acting jurors, and at least one half of the names” and made a related change; deleted the former last sentence, which read: “However, if a juror is so excused within six days prior to trial, an alternate juror will be designated to serve as juror” in subsection E; in subsection F, deleted “in such a manner as the judge may direct” following “shall be called” in the first sentence, deleted “In addition” at the beginning of the second sentence, deleted the former third and fourth sentences which read: “If all nine jurors and two alternates appear and none are stricken for cause, each party shall be entitled to exercise two peremptory strikes. However, if, because of strikes for cause and unexpected failure to appear, fewer than nine but more than five jurors remain before the court, the number of peremptory strikes for each party shall be equally reduced, and the judge shall, if necessary, strike by lot an additional name in order to reduce the jury to five members; however, the judge shall not strike a freeholder if the striking of such name would result in freeholders constituting less than a majority of the members of the jury,” and inserted the present third sentence.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 450 and 720 are identical, and rewrote the section.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Civil Practice and Procedure,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 229 (2007).